Hawaii statutes.
§456-17 Fees. Subject to section
456-18, every notary public is entitled to demand and receive the following
fees:

For noting the protest of mercantile paper, $5;

For each notice and certified copy of protest,
$5;

For noting any other protest, $5;

For every notice thereof, and certified copy of
protest, $5;

For every deposition, or official certificate,
$5;

For the administration of oath, including the
certificate of the oath, $5; for affixing the certificate of the oath to every
duplicate original instrument beyond four, $2.50;

For taking any acknowledgment, $5 for each
party signing; for affixing to every duplicate original beyond one of any
instrument acknowledged before the notary, the notary's certificate of the
acknowledgment, $2.50 for each person making the acknowledgment. [CC 1859,
§1276; L 1888, pt of c 6; am L 1917, c 132, §1; RL 1925, §3183; RL 1935, §5209;
am L 1935, c 147, §1; RL 1945, §7676; am L 1951, c 281, §1; RL 1955, §168-16;
HRS §456-17; am L 1976, c 146, §3; am L 1985, c 154, §1; am L 1995, c 141, §3]

Cross References

Modification of fees, see §92-28.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next